California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) The legislative body of a city or county may declare, by resolution, as public nuisances and abate all illegal on-premises advertising displays located within its jurisdiction. The resolution shall describe the property upon which or in front of which the nuisance exists by giving its lot and block number according to the county or city assessment map and its street address if known. Any number of parcels of private property may be included in one resolution. 

(b) Prior to adoption of the resolution by the legislative body, the clerk of the legislative body shall send
 not less than a 10 days’ written notice to all persons owning property described in the proposed resolution. The notice shall be mailed to each person on whom the described property is assessed on the last equalized assessment roll available on the date the notice is prepared. The notice shall state the date, time, and place of the hearing and generally describe the purpose of the hearing and the nature of the illegality of the display.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.3.

After adoption of the resolution, the enforcement officer shall cause notices to be conspicuously posted on or in front of the property on or in front of which the display exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.4.

The notice shall be substantially in the following form:NOTICE TO REMOVE ILLEGAL ADVERTISING DISPLAY

Notice is hereby given that on the ____ day of ____, 20__, the (name of the legislative body) of (city or county) adopted a resolution declaring that an illegal advertising display is located upon or in front of this property which constitutes a public nuisance and must be abated by the removal of the illegal display. Otherwise, it will be removed, and the nuisance abated by the city (or county). The cost
 of removal will be assessed upon the property from or in front of which the display is removed and will constitute a lien upon the property until paid. Reference is hereby made to the resolution for further particulars. A copy of this resolution is on file in the office of the clerk of the legislative body.

All property owners having any objection to the proposed removal of the display are hereby notified to attend a meeting of the (name of the legislative body) of (city or county) to be held (give date, time, and place), when their objections will be heard and given due consideration.Dated this day of ,20(Title)(City or County of )

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.5.

The notices shall be posted at least 10 days prior to the time for hearing objections by the legislative body of the city or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.6.

In addition to posting notice of the resolution and notice of the meeting when objections will be heard, the legislative body of the city or county shall direct its clerk to mail written notice of the proposed abatement to all persons owning property described in the resolution. The clerk shall cause the written notice to be mailed to each person on whom the described property is assessed in the last equalized assessment roll available on the date the resolution was adopted by the legislative body.

In cities where the county assessor performs the functions of the city assessor, the county assessor, at the request of
 the city clerk, shall, within 10 days thereafter, mail to the city clerk a list of the names and addresses of all of the persons owning property described in the resolution. The address of the owners shown on the assessment roll is conclusively deemed to be the proper address for the purpose of mailing the notice. The city shall reimburse the county for the actual cost of furnishing the list, and the cost shall be a part of the costs of abatement.

The notices mailed by the clerk shall be mailed at least 10 days prior to the time for hearing objections by the legislative body.

The notices mailed by the clerk shall be substantially in the form provided by Section 5499.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.7.

At the time stated in the notices, the legislative body of the city or county shall hear and consider all objections to the proposed removal of the on-premises advertising display. It may continue the hearing from time to time. By motion or resolution at the conclusion of the hearing, the legislative body shall allow or overrule any objections. At that time, the legislative body acquires jurisdiction to proceed and perform the work of removal.

The decision of the legislative body is final. If objections have not been made or after the legislative body has disposed of those made, it shall order the enforcement
 officer to abate the nuisance by having the display removed. The order shall be made by motion or resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.8.

The enforcement officer may enter private property to abate the nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.9.

Before the enforcement officer arrives, any property owner may remove the illegal on-premises advertising display at the owner’s own expense.

Nevertheless, in any case in which an order to abate is issued, the legislative body of the city or county, by motion or resolution, may further order that a special assessment and lien shall be limited to the costs incurred by the city or county, as the case may be, in enforcing abatement upon the property, including investigation, boundary determination, measurement, clerical, and other related costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.10.

(a) The enforcement officer shall keep an account of the cost of abatement of an illegal on-premises advertising display in front of or on each separate parcel of property where the work is done by him or her. He or she shall submit to the legislative body of the city or county for confirmation an itemized written report showing that cost.

(b) A copy of the report shall be posted for at least three days, prior to its submission to the legislative body, on or near the chamber door of the legislative body, with notice of the time of submission.

(c) At the time fixed for receiving and considering the report, the legislative body shall hear it with any objections of the property owners liable to be assessed for the abatement. It may modify the report if it is deemed necessary. The legislative body shall then confirm the report by motion or resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.11.

Abatement of the nuisance may, in the discretion of the legislative body of the city or county, be performed by contract awarded by the legislative body on the basis of competitive bids let to the lowest responsible bidder. In that event, the contractor shall keep the account and submit the itemized written report for each separate parcel of property required by Section 5499.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.12.

(a) The cost of abatement in front of or upon each parcel of property, and the cost incurred by the city or county, as the case may be, in enforcing abatement upon the parcels, including investigation, boundary determination, measurement, clerical, and other related costs, are a special assessment against that parcel. After the assessment is made and confirmed, a lien attaches on the parcel upon recordation of the order confirming the assessment in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property is situated. However, if any real property to which the lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona
 fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of the assessment would become delinquent, the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to the real property and the costs of abatement and the costs of enforcing abatement, as confirmed, relating to the property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection.

(b) After confirmation of the report, a copy shall be given to the city or county assessor and the tax collector, who shall add the amount of the assessment to the next regular tax bill levied against the parcel for municipal purposes.

(c) If the county assessor and the tax collector assess property and collect taxes for the city, the city shall file a certified copy of the report with the county auditor on or before
 August 10. The description of the parcels reported shall be those used for the same parcels on the county assessor’s map books for the current year.

(d) The county auditor shall enter each assessment on the county tax roll opposite the parcel of land.

(e) The amount of the assessment shall be collected at the time and in the manner of ordinary municipal taxes. If delinquent, the amount is subject to the same penalties and procedures of foreclosure and sale provided for ordinary municipal taxes.

The legislative body may determine that, in lieu of collecting the entire assessment at the time and in the manner of ordinary municipal taxes, assessments of fifty dollars ($50) or more may be made in annual installments, not to exceed five, and collected one installment at a time at the time and in the manner of ordinary municipal taxes in
 successive years. If any installment is delinquent, the amount thereof is subject to the same penalties and procedure for foreclosure and sale provided for ordinary municipal taxes. The payment of assessments so deferred shall bear interest on the unpaid balance at a rate to be determined by the legislative body, but not to exceed 6 percent per annum.

(f) As an alternative method, the county tax collector, at his or her discretion, may collect the assessments without reference to the general taxes by issuing separate bills and receipts for the assessments.

(g) Laws relating to the levy, collection, and enforcement of county taxes apply to these special assessments.

(h) The lien of the assessment has the priority of the taxes with which it is collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.13.

The enforcement officer may receive the amount due on the abatement cost and issue receipts at any time after the confirmation of the report and until 10 days before a copy is given to the assessor and tax collector or, where a certified copy is filed with the county auditor, until August 1 following the confirmation of the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.14.

The legislative body of the city or county may order a refund of all or part of an assessment pursuant to this chapter if it finds that all or part of the assessment has been erroneously levied. An assessment, or part thereof, shall not be refunded unless a claim is filed with the clerk of the legislative body on or before November 1 after the assessment became due and payable. The claim shall be verified by the person who paid the assessment or by the person’s guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.15.

If the legislative body finds that property damage was caused by the negligence of a city or county officer or employee in connection with the abatement of a nuisance pursuant to this chapter, a claim for those damages may be paid from the city or county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5499.16.

The proceedings provided by this chapter are an alternative to any procedure established by ordinance pursuant to any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1281, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.7. Advertising for Workers’ Compensation Legal Services [5499.30. - 5499.30.]

5499.30.

(a) Any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, organization, or association which prints, displays, publishes, distributes, or broadcasts or causes or permits to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast any advertising which purports to provide legal services for obtaining workers’ compensation benefits shall include the name of at least one attorney associated with the individual, firm, corporation, partnership, organization, or association in all such advertising.

(b) As used in this section, the term “legal services” includes any service which refers potential clients to any attorney.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 120, Sec. 2.5.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Architecture [5500. - 5610.7.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5500. - 5502.]

5500.

As used in this chapter, architect means a person who is licensed to practice architecture in this state under the authority of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5500.1.

(a) The practice of architecture within the meaning and intent of this chapter is defined as offering or performing, or being in responsible control of, professional services which require the skills of an architect in the planning of sites, and the design, in whole or in part, of buildings, or groups of buildings and structures.

(b) Architects’ professional services may include any or all of the following:

(1) Investigation, evaluation, consultation, and advice.

(2) Planning, schematic and preliminary studies, designs, working drawings, and specifications.

(3) Coordination of the work of technical and special consultants.

(4) Compliance with generally applicable codes and regulations, and assistance in the governmental review process.

(5) Technical assistance in the preparation of bid documents and agreements between clients and contractors.

(6) Contract administration.

(7) Construction observation.

(c) As a condition for licensure, architects shall demonstrate a basic level of competence in the professional services listed in subdivision (b) in examinations administered under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5500.2.

(a) A person may apply to the board and obtain authorization to use the title “architect-in-training” once they have been identified as a candidate for licensure by the board and both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The applicant successfully passed at least one division of the examination described
 in Section 5550.

(2) The applicant submits to the board the name and license number of the licensed architect who will be responsible for supervising the applicant while using the title “architect-in-training”.

(b) (1) Before the board approves an authorization for an applicant to use the title “architect-in-training,” the licensed architect who will be responsible for supervising the applicant while using the title shall submit to the board a form, as determined by the board, agreeing to be responsible for the work to be performed by the applicant while using the title.

(2) (A) If a licensed architect responsible for supervising a person while using the title “architect-in-training” changes, the person using the title shall, within 30 days of the change, notify the board of the change and the name and license number of the subsequent licensed architect who will be responsible for supervising the person while using the title.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding Section 5587, a person using the title “architect-in-training” may, during any period in which the person is not under supervision of a licensed architect, request the board to place their authorization to use the title on inactive status.

(ii) The board may reactivate an authorization made inactive pursuant to clause (i) upon receipt of the name and license number of the subsequent licensed architect who will be responsible for supervising the applicant while using the title. The board shall not require a person seeking reactivation to reapply or pay an additional fee for those purposes.

(c) An abbreviation or derivative of the title “architect-in-training,” other than “AIT,” shall not be used.

(d) A person shall not use the title “architect-in-training” to independently offer or provide architectural services to the public.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may disclose a person’s authorization to use the title “architect-in-training” to a member of the public upon request.

(f) The use of the title “architect-in-training” in violation of this section may constitute unprofessional conduct and subject the user of the title to administrative action, including, but not limited to, citation, discipline, including any disciplinary action pursuant to Section 5587 or any regulation adopted by the board related to this section or Section 5587,
 and denial of a license.

(g) The board may charge a fee, not to exceed the reasonable cost to the board, to evaluate whether a candidate meets the requirements to use the title “architect-in-training.”

(h) (1) A person may use the title
 “architect-in-training” for no more than four years after approval by the board.

(2) A person may apply to the board and obtain authorization to use the title “architect-in-training” a second time if the person has passed a division of the exam described in Section 5500 in the four years immediately preceding the person’s application.

(i) A person shall not apply to the board to obtain authorization to use the title “architect-in-training” on or after January 1,
 2033.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2037, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.   (AB 759)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027.   Repealed as of January 1, 2037, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5501.

This chapter constitutes the chapter on professional architects. It shall be known and may be cited as the Architects Practice Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 566, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5502.

As used in this chapter, board refers to the California Architects Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1054, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [5510. - 5528.]

5510.

There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a California Architects Board which consists of 10 members.

Any reference in law to the California Board of Architectural Examiners shall mean the California Architects Board.

This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 1.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5510.1.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is the mandate of the board to regulate the practice of architecture in the interest and for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare. For this purpose, the board shall delineate the minimum professional qualifications and performance standards for admission to and practice of the profession of architecture. The board shall establish a fair and uniform enforcement policy to deter and prosecute violations of this chapter or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter to provide for the protection of the consumer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5510.15.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the California Architects Board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5514.

The membership of the board shall be composed of 10 members, five of whom shall be architects and five of whom shall be public members.

The five professional members of the board shall be selected from architects in good standing who have been licensed and in practice in this state for at least five years at the time of appointment, all of whom shall be residents and in practice in California.

The public members of the board shall not be licensees of the board.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1988.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2.2) and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1327, Sec. 2.4.   Section operative January 1, 1988, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5515.

(a) Every person appointed shall serve for four years and until the appointment and qualification of their successor or until one year has elapsed since the expiration of the term for which they were appointed, whichever occurs first.

(b) No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms.

(c) Vacancies occurring before the expiration of the term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

(d) Each appointment shall expire on June 30 of the fourth year following the year in which the
 previous term expired.

(e) The Governor shall appoint three of the public members and the five licensed members qualified as provided in Section 5514. The Senate Rules Committee and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 2.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5515.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 130 or 5515, the following provisions shall apply:

(1) Of the three licensed members appointed by the Governor whose terms commence on July 1, 2013, the term of two members shall expire on June 30, 2017, and the term of one member shall expire on June 30, 2019.

(2) Of the two licensed members appointed by the Governor whose terms commence on July 1, 2014, the term of one member shall expire on June 30, 2018, and the term of the other member shall expire on June 30, 2020.

(3) The term of the public member appointed by the
 Governor that commences on July 1, 2014, shall expire on June 30, 2019.

(4) Of the two public members appointed by the Governor whose terms commence on July 1, 2016, the term of one member shall expire on June 30, 2020, and the term of the other member shall expire on June 30, 2021.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), this section shall not be construed to affect the application of Section 130 or 5515 to the terms of a current or future member of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   (AB 1822)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5516.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1645.)
-------------------------------------------

5517.

The board may appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer and who shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the board and vested in the executive officer by this chapter.

This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 3.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5518.

The board shall elect from its members a president, a vice president, and a secretary to hold office for one year, or until their successors are duly elected and qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5520.

The board shall adopt a seal for its own use. The seal used shall have the words, “California Architects Board” inscribed thereon.

The executive officer shall have the care and custody of the seal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 376, Sec. 4.   (SB 608)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5521.

The executive officer shall keep an accurate record of all proceedings of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 42.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5522.

The board shall meet at least once each calendar quarter for the purpose of transacting such business as may lawfully come before it.

The board may hold meetings at such other times and at such places as it may designate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1223, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5523.

Special meetings of the board shall be called by the executive officer upon the written notice of four members by giving each member of the board 10 days’ written notice of the time and place of the meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 43.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5524.

Six of the members of the board constitute a quorum of the board for the transaction of business. The concurrence of five members of the board present at a meeting duly held at which a quorum is present shall be necessary to constitute an act or decision of the board, except that when all 10 members of the board are present at a meeting duly held, the concurrence of six members shall be necessary to constitute an act or decision of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1327, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5525.

The board may prosecute all persons guilty of violating the provisions of this chapter. Except as provided in Section 159.5, the board may employ inspectors, special agents, investigators, and such clerical assistants as it may deem necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter. It may also fix the compensation to be paid for such services and incur such additional expense as may be deemed necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

5526.

(a) The board shall adopt rules and regulations governing the examination of applicants for licenses to practice architecture in this state.

(b) The board may, by rule or regulation, adopt rules of professional conduct that are not inconsistent with state or federal law. Every person who holds a license issued by the board shall be governed and controlled by these rules.

(c) The board may adopt other rules and regulations as may be necessary and proper.

(d) The board may, from time to time, repeal, amend, or modify rules and regulations adopted under this section. No rule or regulation shall be inconsistent with this chapter.

(e) The board shall adopt, by regulation, a system as described in Section 125.9 for the issuance to a licensee of a citation and a system as described in Section 148 for the issuance of an administrative citation to an unlicensed person who is acting in the capacity of a licensee or registrant under the jurisdiction of the board.

(f) The adoption, repeal, amendment, or modification of these rules and regulations shall be made in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 759, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5526.5.

(a) In addition to requesting an administrative hearing as provided for in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 125.9, the cited person may request an informal conference to review the acts shared in the citation. The cited person shall make the request for an informal conference in writing, within 30 days of the date of issuance of the citation, to the executive officer.

(b) The executive officer or their designee shall hold, within 60 days from the receipt of the request, an informal conference with the cited person. The executive officer or their designee may extend the 60-day period for good cause.

(c) Following the informal conference, the executive officer or their
 designee may affirm, modify, or dismiss the citation, including any fine that is levied, order of abatement, or order of correction issued. The executive officer or their designee shall state in writing the reasons for the action and transmit a copy of those findings to the cited person within 30 days after the informal conference.

(d) If the citation, including any fine that is levied or order of abatement or correction, is affirmed or modified following the informal conference, the respondent may make a request in writing to the executive officer within 30 days of the affirmed or modified citation, for a formal hearing, which shall be conducted as provided for in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 125.9.

(e) A cited person shall not request an informal conference for a citation which has been affirmed or modified following an informal
 conference.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 376, Sec. 5.   (SB 608)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5527.

Whenever any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or which will constitute an offense against this chapter, the superior court of the county in which the offense has occurred or is about to occur, on application of the board, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining such act or practice.

The proceedings authorized by this section shall be in accordance with the provisions contained in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5528.

(a) The board may select and contract with necessary architect consultants who are licensed architects to assist it in its enforcement program on an intermittent basis. The architect consultants shall perform only those services that are necessary to carry out and enforce this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, any consultant under contract with the board shall be considered a public employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 475, Sec. 1.2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of Chapter [5535. - 5538.]

5535.

As used in this chapter, the word “person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, general corporation, professional corporation, or limited liability partnership, as authorized by the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 275, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5535.1.

The phrase “responsible control” means that amount of control over the content of all architectural instruments of service during their preparation that is ordinarily exercised by architects applying the required professional standard of care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5535.2.

(a) This chapter does not prevent an architect from forming a business entity or collaborating with persons who are not architects, provided that any architects’ professional services that are provided through that entity or collaboration are offered and provided under the responsible control of an architect, or architects, and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) (1) A business entity organized as a general corporation may include in its name any or all of the following:

(A) A fictitious name.

(B) The name of one or more licensed architects.

(C) The term “architect,” the term “architecture,” or a variation of the term “architect” or “architecture.”

(2) Nothing in paragraph (1) shall limit a business entity organized as a general corporation from including in its name any other word or name that is not otherwise prohibited by law.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), a business entity organized as a general corporation shall not include in its name the term “professional corporation.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 2.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5535.25.

As used in this chapter, the terms “business entity” and “collaboration” include employer and employee relationships, joint ventures, partnerships, general corporations, and consulting relationships formed by written agreement in which the architect provides immediate and responsible direction of architectural services. For purposes of this section, “immediate and responsible direction” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 151 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 275, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5535.3.

This chapter does not prevent a corporation from furnishing or supplying by contract architectural services, as long as any architects’ professional services are offered and provided under the responsible control of a licensed architect or architects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 275, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.

(a) It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, for any person who is not licensed to practice architecture under this chapter to practice architecture in this state, to use any term confusingly similar to the word architect, to use the stamp of a licensed architect, as provided in Section 5536.1, or to advertise or put out any sign, card, or other device that might indicate to the public that the person is an architect, is qualified to engage in the practice of architecture, or is an architectural designer.

(b) It is a misdemeanor, punishable
 as specified in subdivision (a), for any person who is not licensed to practice architecture under this chapter to affix a stamp or seal that bears the legend “State of California” or words or symbols that represent or imply that the person is so licensed by the state to prepare plans, specifications, or instruments of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 376, Sec. 6.   (SB 608)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.1.

(a) All persons preparing or being in responsible control of plans, specifications, and instruments of service for others shall sign those plans, specifications, and instruments of service and all contracts therefor, and, if licensed under this chapter, shall affix a stamp, which complies with subdivision (b), to those plans, specifications, and instruments of service, as evidence of the person’s responsibility for those documents. The failure of any person to comply with this subdivision is a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 5536. This section shall not apply to employees of persons licensed under this chapter while acting within the course of their employment.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, any stamp used by any architect licensed under this chapter shall be of a design authorized by the board, which shall at a minimum bear the licensee’s name, their license number, the legend “licensed architect” and the legend “State of California,” and which shall provide a means of indicating the renewal date of the license.

(c) The preparation of plans, specifications, or instruments of service for any building, except the buildings described in Section 5537, by any person who is not licensed to practice architecture in this state, is a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 5536.

(d) The board may adopt regulations necessary for the implementation of this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 482, Sec. 4.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.2.

Each county or city which requires the issuance of any permit as a condition precedent to the construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of any building or structure shall also require as a condition precedent to the issuance of the permit a signed statement that the person who prepared or was in responsible control of the plans and specifications for the construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of the building or structure is licensed under this chapter to prepare the plans and specifications, or is otherwise licensed in this state to prepare the plans and specifications.

The signature and stamp, as provided for in Section 5536.1, on the plans and specifications by the person who prepared or was in responsible control of the plans and specifications shall constitute compliance with this section.

It is the responsibility of the agency that issues the permit to determine that the person who signed and stamped the plans and specifications or who submitted the signed statement required by this section is licensed under this chapter or is otherwise licensed in this state to prepare the plans and specifications. 

This section shall not apply to the issuance of permits where the preparation of plans and specifications for the construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of a building or structure is exempt from this chapter, except that the person preparing the plans and specifications for others shall sign the plans and specifications as provided by Section 5536.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 184, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.22.

(a) An architect shall use a written contract when contracting to provide professional services to a client pursuant to this chapter. That written contract shall be executed by the architect and the client, or the client’s representative, prior to the architect commencing work, unless the client knowingly states in writing that work may be commenced before the contract is executed. The written contract shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following items:

(1) A description of the project for which the client is seeking services. 

(2) A description of the services to be provided by the architect to the client.

(3) A description of any basis of compensation applicable to the contract and the method of payment agreed upon by both parties.

(4) The name, address, and license number of the architect, the name and address of the client, and the project address.
